Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.140

Appeal does not delay possession if award paid.

An appeal from such judgment by the owner or owners of the land sought to be taken, shall not have the effect to preclude the school district from taking possession of the premises sought, pending the appeal, provided the amount of the judgment against the school district shall have been paid in to the clerk of the court, as hereinbefore provided.

[ 1909 p 375 s 14; 1903 c 111 s 14; RRS s 919.]